South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Additional Regulations Applicable to Specific Properties, designated as Regulation Document Number 5329, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Natural Resources proposes to amend Regulation 123-204 "Additional Regulations Applicable to Specific Properties". The subject of the proposed action is to amend the regulations to close access and landing, including intertidal areas, at Deveaux Bank between March 15 and October 15 to protect sea and shorebirds. Deveaux Bank is closed to public access year-round above the high tide line in order to protect birds, and other wildlife, during sensitive periods. Deveaux Bank was heavily impacted by recent storm events, including Hurricane Idalia, and experienced significant erosion. Public access to Deveaux Bank was closed by Emergency Regulation in May 2024 in order to protect nesting and migrating sea and shorebirds based on input from biologists, constituents and the public. Due to loss of nesting habitat and potential for significant disturbance to nesting birds by members of the public it is important to close all access to Deveaux Bank, including the intertidal zone, between March 15 and October 15 annually. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 27, 2024. ----XX----